Utah statutes.
53A-15-1101.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Principal" includes the chief administrator of a school that does not have a principal.

(2)  "School" means a public school, including a charter school.

(3)  "School official" means the principal of a school or the local school board for a school district.

(4)  "School uniform" means student clothing conforming to a school uniform policy under this part, which may include a dress code, dress of designated colors, or a reasonable designated uniform of a particular style.  A school uniform policy may not include very expensive or prescriptive clothing requirements.

